Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
PART 1 Emergency Receiving Facilities for Examination of Persons
Apprehended Pursuant to Physician’s Certificate or
Court Order

37-7-40.
Designation by department of emergency receiving facilities; reporting; penalty for noncompliance.

Any state owned or state operated facility may be designated by the department as an emergency receiving facility. The department shall maintain an emergency receiving facility at each Georgia regional hospital which shall accept, under Code Sections
37-7-41 through 37-7-44, patients found in any county in the service region of the hospital. Any other facility within the State of Georgia may be so designated by the department at the request of or with the consent of the governing
officers of the facility.

No later than January 15, 2023, any emergency receiving facility designated under this Code section shall report to the department de-identified, aggregated data with the total number of:

Certificates received at the emergency receiving facility by county issued under subsection (a) of Code Section 37-7-41;

Such certificates received at the emergency receiving facility by each type of licensed professional authorized under Code Section 37-7-41;

Individuals examined in each emergency receiving facility designated or utilized by the department in accordance with subsection (a) of Code Section 37-7-41; and

Individuals admitted to each emergency receiving facility designated or utilized by the department following an examination in accordance with subsection (a) of Code Section 37-7-41.

The frequency of the reporting requirement required by subsection (b) of this Code section shall be determined by the department no later than December 31, 2021.

Failure to submit the information required by subsection (b) of this Code section as directed by the department shall result in the suspension of a facility’s designation as an emergency receiving facility until the required reports are submitted to the
department.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-404.6, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 273, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-404.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 2021, p. 686, § 3/HB 591.

The 2021 amendment,
effective July 1, 2021, designated the existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (a) and added subsections (b) through (d).

37-7-41.
Emergency involuntary treatment; who may certify need; delivery for examination; report of delivery required; annual report.

Any physician within this state may execute a certificate stating that he has personally examined a person within the preceding 48 hours and found that, based upon observations set forth in the certificate, the person appears to be an alcoholic, a drug
dependent individual, or a drug abuser requiring involuntary treatment. A physician’s certificate shall expire seven days after it is executed. Any peace officer, within 72 hours after receiving such certificate, shall make diligent
efforts to take into custody the person named in the certificate and to deliver him forthwith to the nearest available emergency receiving facility serving the county in which the patient is found, where he shall be received for
examination.

The appropriate court of the county in which a person may be found may issue an order commanding any peace officer to take such person into custody and deliver him forthwith for examination, either to the nearest available emergency receiving facility
serving the county in which the patient is found, where such person shall be received for examination, or to a physician who has agreed to examine such patient and who will provide, where appropriate, a certificate pursuant to
subsection (a) of this Code section to permit delivery of such patient to an emergency receiving facility pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section. Such order may only be issued if based either upon an unexpired physician’s
certificate, as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, or upon the affidavits of at least two persons who attest that, within the preceding 48 hours, they have seen the person to be taken into custody and that, based
upon observations contained in their affidavit, they have reason to believe such person is an alcoholic, a drug dependent individual, or a drug abuser requiring involuntary treatment. The court order shall expire seven days after
it is executed.

Any peace officer taking into custody and delivering for examination a person, as authorized by subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section, shall execute a written report detailing the circumstances under which such person was taken into custody. The
report and either the physician’s certificate or court order authorizing such custody shall be made a part of the patient’s record.

Any psychologist, clinical social worker, licensed professional counselor, marriage and family therapist, or clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health may perform any act specified by this Code section to be performed by a physician. Any
reference in any part of this chapter to a physician acting under this Code section shall be deemed to refer equally to a psychologist, a clinical social worker, a licensed professional counselor, a marriage and family therapist,
or a clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health acting under this Code section. For purposes of this Code section, the term “psychologist” means any person authorized under the laws of this state to practice as a licensed
psychologist; the term “clinical social worker” means any person authorized under the laws of this state to practice as a licensed clinical social worker; the term “licensed professional counselor” means any person authorized under
the laws of this state to practice as a licensed professional counselor; the term “marriage and family therapist” means any person authorized under the laws of this state to practice as a licensed marriage and family therapist;
and the term “clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health” means any person authorized under the laws of this state to practice as a registered professional nurse and who is recognized by the Georgia Board of Nursing
to be engaged in advanced nursing practice as a clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health.

No later than February 15, 2023, and annually thereafter, the department shall prepare a report with de-identified, aggregated data from the written reports required by subsection (b) of Code Section 37-7-40 to the General Assembly, the Governor, the
Lieutenant Governor, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives during each regular legislative session. The annual report shall include the following data from the previous calendar year:

The total number of certificates received at the emergency receiving facility by county from which the certificate was issued;

The total number of certificates received at the emergency receiving facility by each type of licensed professional authorized by this Code section;

The total number of individuals examined in each emergency receiving facility designated or utilized by the department in accordance with subsection (a) of this Code section; and

The total number of individuals admitted to each emergency receiving facility designated or utilized by the department following an examination in accordance with subsection (a) of this Code section.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-404.7, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 273, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-404.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 996, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 37; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2531, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1249,
§ 2; Ga. L. 2014, p. 347, § 2/SB 65; Ga. L. 2015, p. 4, § 1/SB 53; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 37/HB 737; Ga. L. 2017, p. 617, § 1/SB 52; Ga. L. 2021, p. 686, § 4/HB 591.

The 2021 amendment,
effective July 1, 2021, in subsection (d), inserted “marriage and family therapist,” near the middle of the first sentence, inserted “a marriage and family therapist,” in the middle of the second sentence, inserted “the
term ‘marriage and family therapist’ means any person authorized under the laws of this state to practice as a licensed marriage and family therapist;” in the middle of the third sentence; and added subsection (e).

Cross references.

Arrest of persons, T. 17, C. 4.

Licensing of applied psychologists, T. 43, C. 39.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 347, § 2A/SB 65, as amended by Ga. L. 2015, p. 4, § 1/SB 53, which provides for the repeal of the amendment made by § 1 of that Act was repealed by Ga. L. 2017, p. 617, § 1/SB 52, effective May 9, 2017.

Law reviews.

For note, “The Diversion of Drug Abusers from the Criminal Justice System: Georgia’s Proposed Legislation,” see 23 Emory L.J. 1071 (1974).

For survey article on torts, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 271 (1982).

For comment, “1986 Amendments to Georgia’s Mental Health Statutes: The Latest Attempt to Provide a Solution to the Problem of the Chronically Mentally Ill,” see 36 Emory L.J. 1313 (1987).

For survey article on construction law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 55 (2007).

37-7-42.
Emergency admission of persons arrested for penal offenses; report by officer; entry of report into clinical record.

A peace officer may take any person to a physician within the county or an adjoining county for emergency examination by the physician, as provided in Code Section 37-7-41, or directly to an emergency receiving facility if the person is committing a penal
offense and the peace officer has probable cause for believing that the person is an alcoholic, a drug dependent individual, or a drug abuser requiring involuntary treatment. The peace officer need not formally tender charges
against the individual prior to taking the individual to a physician or an emergency receiving facility under this Code section. The peace officer shall execute a written report detailing the circumstances under which the
person was taken into custody; and this report shall be made a part of the patient’s clinical record.

A peace officer may take any person to an emergency receiving facility if: (i) the peace officer has probable cause to believe that the person is an alcoholic, a drug dependent individual, or a drug abuser requiring involuntary treatment; and (ii) the
peace officer has consulted either in-person or via telephone or telehealth with a physician, as provided in Code Section 37-7-41, and the physician authorizes the peace officer to transport the individual for an evaluation.
To authorize transport for evaluation, the physician shall determine, based on facts available regarding the person’s condition, including the report of the peace officer and the physician’s communications with the person
or witnesses, that there is probable cause to believe that the person needs an examination to determine if the person requires involuntary treatment. The peace officer shall execute a written report detailing the circumstances
under which the person is detained; and this report shall be made a part of the patient’s clinical record.

Any psychologist may perform any act specified by this Code section to be performed by a physician. Any reference in any part of this chapter to a physician acting under this Code section shall be deemed to refer equally to a psychologist acting under
this Code section. For purposes of this subsection, the term “psychologist” means any person authorized under the laws of this state to practice as a licensed psychologist.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-404.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 996, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 37; Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 3-6/HB 1013.

The 2022 amendment,
effective July 1, 2022, designated the existing provisions of subsection (a) as paragraph (a)(1), and added paragraph (a)(2).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, “physician” was substituted for “physican” following “examination by the” in the first sentence of subsection (a).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2022, “is” was inserted in the last sentence of paragraph (a)(2).

Cross references.

Arrest of persons, T. 17, C. 4.

Licensing of applied psychologists, T. 43, C. 39.

37-7-43.
Procedure upon admission; notice of proposed discharge.

A patient who is admitted to an emergency receiving facility shall be examined by a physician as soon thereafter as possible but in any event within 48 hours and may be given such emergency treatment as is indicated by good medical practice. The patient
must be discharged within 48 hours of his admission unless:

An examining physician or psychologist concludes that there is reason to believe that the patient may be an alcoholic, a drug dependent individual, or a drug abuser requiring involuntary treatment and executes a certificate to that effect within such
time; or

The patient is under criminal charges, notice of which has been given in writing to the facility, in which case the provisions of Code Section 37-7-95 shall apply.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a physician or psychologist who previously executed a certificate authorized by the provisions of this chapter from executing any other certificate provided for in this chapter for the same or any
other patient.

Within 24 hours of the execution of the certificate under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section, the patient shall be transported, as provided in Code Section 37-7-101, to an evaluating facility where he shall be received pursuant to Code
Section 37-7-63 unless the patient has been determined and certified to meet all of the outpatient treatment requirements of paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subsection (c) of Code Section 37-7-90, in which event the patient shall
be discharged under the conditions provided in Code Section 37-7-91, except that if the patient is under criminal charges, notice of which has been given in writing to the facility, the provisions of Code Section 37-7-95 shall
apply.

Notice of any proposed discharge shall be given to the patient and his representatives; if the patient was admitted to the facility under subsection (a) of Code Section 37-7-41, to the physician or psychologist who executed the certificate; if the patient
was admitted to the facility under subsection (b) of Code Section 37-7-41, to the court which issued the order; and if the patient was under criminal charges, written notice of which had been given to the facility, by certified
mail or statutory overnight delivery to the law enforcement agency originally having custody of the patient.

History.
Code 1933, §§ 88-404.8, 88-404.9, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 273, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1293, § 5; Code 1933, §§ 88-404.4, 88-404.5, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 937, §§ 2, 10; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1024,
§ 4; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1098, § 7; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 30; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1902, § 17; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Cross references.

Arrest of persons, T. 17, C. 4.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

Law reviews.

For survey article on torts, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 271 (1982).

For comment, “1986 Amendments to Georgia’s Mental Health Statutes: The Latest Attempt to Provide a Solution to the Problem of the Chronically Mentally Ill,” see 36 Emory L.J. 1313 (1987).

37-7-44.
Giving patient and his representatives notice of their rights upon patient’s admission to emergency receiving facility.

Immediately upon arrival of a patient at an emergency receiving facility under Code Section 37-7-43, the facility shall give the patient written notice of his right to petition for a writ of habeas corpus or for a protective order under Code Section 37-7-148.
This written notice shall also inform the patient that he has a right to legal counsel and that, if the patient is unable to afford counsel, the court will appoint counsel.

The notice informing the patient’s representatives of the patient’s hospitalization in an emergency receiving facility shall include a clear notification that the representatives may petition for a writ of habeas corpus or for a protective order under
Code Section 37-7-148.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-404.10, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 273, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-404.6, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1098, § 7.

Cross references.

Arrest of persons, T. 17, C. 4.